test/src/morphology/V-mow_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mow - help : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: nimowâw
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kimowâw
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: [mowêw, mowik, mowkow]
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3SgO: [mowêyiwa, mowikoyiwa]

     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: nimowânân
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kimowânaw
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kimowâwâw
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: [mowêwak, mowkow]
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oPl+3SgO: mowêyiwa

     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: nimowâwak
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kimowâwak
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: [mowêw, mowikowak, mowikak]
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3PlO: mowêyiwa
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3oPlO: mowikoyiwa

     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: nimowânânak
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kimowânawak
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kimowâwâwak
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: mowikowak
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: mowêwak
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oPl+3PlO: mowêyiwa

     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: nimowik
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kimowik
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: nimowikonân
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kimowikonaw
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kimowikowâw
     
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: nimowikwak
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kimowikwak
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: nimowikonânak
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kimowikonawak
     mow+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kimowikowâwak




     
     
     
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+1Sg+3SgO: ê-mowak
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+1Sg+3PlO: ê-mowakik
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+1Pl+3SgO: ê-mowâyâhk
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+1Pl+3PlO: ê-mowâyâhkik
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+12Pl+3SgO: ê-mowâyâhk
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+12Pl+3PlO: ê-mowâyâhkok
     
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+2Sg+3SgO: ê-mowat
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+2Sg+3PlO: ê-mowacik
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+2Pl+3SgO: ê-mowâyêk
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+2Pl+3PlO: ê-mowâyêkok

     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+3oPlO: ê-mowikocik
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+3SgO: ê-mowâcik
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+3PlO: ê-mowâcik
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+2SgO: ê-mowiskik
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+2PlO: ê-mowikoyêkok
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+1SgO: ê-mowicik
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+1PlO: ê-mowikoyâhkik
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+12PlO: ê-mowikoyâhkok

     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+3oPlO: ê-mowikocik
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+3SgO: ê-mowât
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+3PlO: ê-mowât
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+2SgO: ê-mowisk
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+2PlO: ê-mowikoyêk
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+1SgO: ê-mowit
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+1PlO: ê-mowikoyâhk
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+12PlO: ê-mowikoyahk

     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3oSgO: ê-mowkoyit
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3oPlO: ê-mowikoyit
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3SgO: ê-mowkot
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3SgO: ê-mowikot
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3PlO: ê-mowikocik

     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3oSgO: ê-mowkoyit
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3oPlO: ê-mowikoyit
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3SgO: ê-mowkot
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3SgO: ê-mowikot
     mow+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3PlO: ê-mowikocik


     mow+V+TA+Fut+1Sg+3SgO: mowaki
     mow+V+TA+Fut+1Sg+3PlO: mowakwâwi
     mow+V+TA+Fut+1Pl+3SgO: mowâyâhki
     mow+V+TA+Fut+1Pl+3PlO: mowâyâhkwâwi
     mow+V+TA+Fut+12Pl+3SgO: mowâyâhko
     mow+V+TA+Fut+12Pl+3PlO: mowâyâhkwâwi

     mow+V+TA+Fut+2Sg+3SgO: mowaci
     mow+V+TA+Fut+2Sg+3PlO: mowatwâwi
     mow+V+TA+Fut+2Pl+3SgO: mowâyêko
     mow+V+TA+Fut+2Pl+3PlO: mowâyêkwâwi

     mow+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+3SgO: mowâci
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+3oSgO: mowâyici
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+3PlO: mowikotwâwi
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+1SgO: mowici
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+2SgO: mowiski
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+1PlO: mowikoyâhki
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+2PlO: mowikoyêko
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+12PlO: mowikoyahko

     mow+V+TA+Fut+3Pl+3SgO: mowâtwâwi
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3Pl+3PlO: mowâtwâwi
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3Pl+3PlO: mowikotwâwi


     mow+V+TA+Fut+3oSg+3SgO: mowikoci
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3oSg+3PlO: mowâyici
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3oPl+3SgO: mowikoci
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3oPl+3PlO: mowâyici
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3oSg+3oPlO: mowikoyici
     mow+V+TA+Fut+3oPl+3oPlO: mowikoyici


     mow+V+TA+Imp+2Sg+3SgO: mow
     mow+V+TA+Imp+2Pl+3SgO: mowihk
     mow+V+TA+Imp+12Pl+3SgO: mowâtân

     mow+V+TA+Imp+2Sg+3PlO: mowik
     mow+V+TA+Imp+2Pl+3PlO: mowihkok
     mow+V+TA+Imp+12Pl+3PlO: mowâtânik

     mow+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: mowâhkan
     mow+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: mowâhkêk
     mow+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: mowâhkak

     mow+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: mowâhkanik
     mow+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: mowihkâhkêkok
     mow+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: mowâhkakok
